District of Columbia statutes.
34-1218

Repealed

Arbitrary and capricious discontinuance of service by franchisee.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 19, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 3(6), 30 DCR 4289
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334
1981 Ed., § 43-1818.